Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-964
Employer; pay to board; withholding of excess deduction.

Every employer shall pay to the retirement board the required deposits made by every member in the service of such employer. No employer shall, without the consent of the member, withhold or deduct from any member's compensation on any payroll any amount in excess of the required deduction for the period covered by such payroll.

Laws 1956, c. 219, § 38, p. 650;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-2938;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 471, p. 852;

Laws 1976, LB 30, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1537;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 599.